California statutes. Corporations Code
(b) In the initial construction, extension, or modification of a water system, any one of which is required to serve (1) a new user or (2) a change in use, the facilities constructed, extended, or modified shall be designed to be capable of providing, for a sustained period of at least two hours, in addition to the requirements of the average daily demand within the area to be served, the minimum flow requirements set forth below opposite the classification of land use to be served:Land UseMinimum Flow1.Rural, residential with a lot density of two or fewer units per acre primarily for recreational and retirement use 250 gpm2.Lot density of less than one single-family residential unit per acre500 gpm3.Lot density of one or two single-family residential units per acre750 gpm4.Lot density of three or more single-family residential units per acre1,000 gpm5.Duplex residential units, neighborhood business of one story1,500 gpm6.Multiple residential, one and two stories; light commercial or light industrial2,000 gpm7.Multiple residential, three stories or higher; heavy commercial or heavy industrial2,500 gpm

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 598, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14316.

The water supply and distribution system of a mutual water company described in Section 14311 that proposes to distribute water for domestic use shall be constructed to conform with currently accepted engineering practices, and shall comply with the following construction standards where possible:

(a) Water mains to be installed below the frost level or otherwise protected to prevent freezing and shall not have less than 30 inches of cover over the top of the pipe in public streets or alleys except
 where such depth is rendered impossible by underground obstructions or rocky or hardpan conditions.

(b) The size, design, material, and installation of service pipes shall conform to the reasonable requirements of the mutual water company; provided, however, that the minimum size of the pipe shall be 34 inch or greater nominal size. Except where services are not intended for use during freezing weather and arrangements are made to drain service pipes prior to freezing weather, and except at terminations in connection with the meter or water consumer’s piping, all service pipes shall be laid at a depth sufficient to prevent freezing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 598, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14317.

The fire protection system of a mutual water company shall be constructed to conform with currently accepted engineering practices, and shall comply with the following construction standards:

(a) The flows set forth in Section 14315 shall be calculated on the basis of a residual pressure of 20 p.s.i.g. in the distribution system under flowing conditions.

(b) Fire hydrants shall be attached to the distribution systems at the locations
 designated by the entity responsible for their use for firefighting purposes. Any new mains to which a hydrant may be attached shall not be less than six inches in diameter.

(c) Each separately operated water system shall not have less than two independent sources of supply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 598, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14318.

The mutual water company shall be financially responsible for the maintenance, repair, or replacement of fire hydrants. A mutual water company shall perform and record annual flow tests pursuant to Section 14317 or, in lieu of the annual flow test under Section 14317, any test to determine available flow performed by a fire protection agency. The recorded test results shall become part of the mutual water company’s books and records.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 598, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 9. CABLE TELEVISION CORPORATIONS [14400. - 14400.]

14400.

Any person who willfully and maliciously does any injury to any property of a cable television corporation is liable to the corporation for three times the amount of actual damages sustained thereby, to be recovered in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 598, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 11. SOCIETIES FOR THE PREVENTION OF CRUELTY TO ANIMALS [14500. - 14505.]

14500.

This title extends to all corporations heretofore formed and existing for the prevention of cruelty to animals, but does not extend or apply to any association, society, or corporation that uses or specifies a name or style of the same, or substantially the same, as that of any previously existing society or corporation in this state organized for a like purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 652, Sec. 8.   (SB 1417)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14501.

Every society incorporated and organized for the prevention of cruelty to animals may enter into a contract with any city, city and county, or county, where the society is located, to enforce the provisions of laws of this state for the prevention of cruelty to animals, or arresting or prosecuting offenders thereunder, or preventing cruelty to animals. A humane society may perform those actions in the absence of a contract with a city, city and county, or county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 45.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14502.

(a) (1) (A) (i) On and after July 1, 1996, no entity, other than a humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, shall be eligible to petition for confirmation of an appointment of any individual as a humane officer, the duty of which shall be the enforcement of the laws for the prevention of cruelty to animals.

(ii) On and after July 1, 1996, only a person who meets the requirements of this section may be appointed as, or perform the duties of, a humane officer.

(iii) Any person appointed as a humane officer before July 1, 1996, may
 continue to serve as a humane officer until the expiration of the term of appointment only if the appointing society maintains records pursuant to subparagraph (B) documenting that both the appointing society and the humane officer meet the requirements of this section.

(B) Each humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals for which an individual is acting as a humane officer shall maintain complete and accurate records documenting that the individual has successfully completed all requirements established in this section and shall make those records available, upon request, to the superior court, the Attorney General, or any entity duly authorized to review that information, including the California Animal Welfare Association. The records shall include the full name and address of each humane officer.

(2) The humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shall possess insurance of at least one million dollars
 ($1,000,000) for liability for bodily injury or property damage.

(3) Each appointment of a humane officer shall be by separate resolution by the board of directors or trustees of the humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals duly entered in its minutes. The resolution shall state the full name and address of the principal office of the appointing society, the full name of the person so appointed, the fact that the person so appointed is a citizen of the State of California, that the person so appointed has met the training requirements set forth in subdivision (h), and whether the person so appointed is authorized to carry a weapon pursuant to this section. The resolution shall also designate the number of the badge to be allotted to the officer, and the date on which the term of office shall expire.

(b) A humane society or a society for the prevention of cruelty to animals seeking confirmation of a humane officer’s appointment shall comply with each of the following provisions:

(1) (A) Before filing a Petition for Order Confirming Appointment of a Humane Officer under paragraph (3), a humane officer applicant shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history background check.

(B) A city, county, and city and county humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for humane officer applicants pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a
 state and federal response to a government entity pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state response to a nongovernmental entity pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(C) The submitting entity shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for persons whose appointments are confirmed as described in subdivision (c).

(D) The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing the request described in this paragraph.

(2) When filing a Petition for Order Confirming Appointment of a Humane Officer under
 paragraph (3), the humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shall serve a copy of the petition on each of the following:

(A) The police department having jurisdiction in the city in which the principal office of the appointing society is located.

(B) The sheriff’s department having jurisdiction in the county in which the principal office of the appointing society is located.

(C) The Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(D) The California Animal Welfare Association.

(E) The animal control agency having jurisdiction in the city in which the principal office of the appointing
 society is located. If the sheriff’s department or police department entitled to notice under subparagraph (A) or (B) provides animal control services for the city in which the principal office of the appointing society is located, no separate notice is required under this subparagraph.

(F) The Department of Justice.

(3) The humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shall file with the superior court in and for the county or city and county in which the principal office of the humane society is located a Petition for Order Confirming Appointment of a Humane Officer, and shall attach to the petition all of the following:

(A) A copy of the resolution appointing the person, duly certified to be
 correct by the president and secretary of the society and attested by its seal.

(B) A copy of the criminal record offender information, if any, obtained regarding the person pursuant to paragraph (1).

(C) Proof of the society’s proper incorporation in compliance with Part 9 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 2, including the date the articles of incorporation were filed with the Secretary of State.

(D) A copy of the society’s liability insurance policy for bodily injury or property damage in the amount of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(E) Documentation establishing that the appointee has satisfactorily completed the training requirements
 set forth in this section.

(F) Documentation establishing that the society has a written agreement with another entity, such as a public or private animal shelter or licensed veterinary clinic, that (i) provides for the humane care and treatment of any animals seized by the society, (ii) is capable of preserving evidence that may be used to prosecute an animal cruelty case, and (iii) is compliant with all applicable federal, state, and local laws, including licensing laws. Alternatively, the society may provide documentation that it is operating its own animal shelter that meets the requirements of clauses (i), (ii), and (iii).

(G) If the society has not previously appointed a humane officer:

(i) An affidavit
 signed under penalty of perjury from the president of the society that demonstrates the society’s competence to appoint a humane officer by providing information, including, but not limited to, the following:

(I) Partnerships or collaborations, if any, with other nonprofit or community agencies.

(II) Cash reserve on hand, if any, to pay for veterinary expenses, housing, food, and care of seized animals.

(III) Established donor base, if any.

(IV) Current or prior law enforcement, legal, or other relevant experience, if any, of persons who will supervise the appointee.

(V) Current or prior experience of
 managers, if any, in operating a society or other nonprofit organization.

(VI) Statement that each board member is in good standing in the community and has not been convicted of a misdemeanor or felony involving animals.

(VII) Ongoing training beyond the minimum required for appointment of the humane officer, if any.

(VIII) The need for a humane officer in the society’s county.

(IX) Any other documentation demonstrating compliance with applicable federal, state, or local laws.

(ii) Affidavits, if any, from personnel of local animal control agencies, law enforcement agencies, or other societies
 pertaining to the appointee’s fitness to act as a humane officer.

(H) As the last page, proof of service of a copy of the petition upon those parties required to be served.

(4) Any party described in paragraph (2) may file an opposition to the petition described in paragraph (3). All papers filed in opposition to the petition and in reply to the opposition shall conform to law and motion pleading requirements, pursuant to Rule 3.1113(d) of the California Rules of Court. An opposition shall not exceed 15 pages and a reply shall not exceed 10 pages, excluding exhibits and declarations. The opposition shall be limited to the competency of the society to appoint and supervise a humane officer and the qualifications, background, and fitness of the appointee that are specific to the
 work of a humane officer.

(A) Any opposition shall be filed no later than 15 court days after the petition is filed with the court. Any opposition shall be served on all parties indicated on the proof of service attached to the petition.

(B) The petitioner’s reply, if any, to the opposition shall be filed within 10 court days after service of the opposition. The reply shall be served on all parties listed in the proof of service attached to the petition and to any other person who has filed an opposition.

(C) The court shall rule on the petition without a hearing unless the court notifies the parties of an intention to hold a hearing.

(D) The petitioner shall serve a
 certified copy of the court’s order ruling on the petition on all parties listed in the proof of service attached to the petition and to any other person or entity who has filed an opposition.

(c) (1) Upon receipt of the Petition for Order Confirming Appointment of a Humane Officer, the court shall first determine the society’s date of incorporation, and the length of time between the date the society filed its articles of incorporation with the Secretary of State and the date it filed the petition described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) with the court. If the society was incorporated on or after January 1, 2011, the following shall apply:

(A) For a petition to confirm appointment of a level 1 humane officer, the court shall issue an order denying
 confirmation of the appointment if a minimum of five years has not elapsed from the date the society filed its articles of incorporation with the Secretary of State to the date it filed the petition.

(B) For a petition to confirm appointment of a level 2 humane officer, the court shall issue an order denying confirmation of the appointment if a minimum of one year has not elapsed from the date the society filed its articles of incorporation with the Secretary of State to the date it filed the petition.

(C) For a petition to confirm appointment of either a level 1 or level 2 humane officer, the court shall issue an order denying confirmation of the appointment if the society has not established, through submission of appropriate documentation, that the society is either operating
 its own animal shelter or has a written agreement with another entity, in compliance with subparagraph (F) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).

(2) If the court has not issued an order denying the petition pursuant to paragraph (1), the court shall review the matter of the appointee’s qualifications and fitness to act as a humane officer. The court shall also consider any documentation it has received in support of, or in opposition to, the confirmation of the person’s appointment. If the court finds that the appointee is qualified and fit to act as a humane officer, the court shall issue an order confirming the appointment. The society shall thereupon file a certified copy of the court order in the office of the county clerk of the county or city and county in which the court is located. The appointee shall, at the same time, take and
 subscribe an oath of office prescribed for peace officers. The society shall also provide a copy of the Order Confirming Appointment to the California Animal Welfare Association and the Department of Justice. The Department of Justice may charge a reasonable fee sufficient to cover the costs of maintaining records of Orders Confirming Appointment. If the court does not find the appointee qualified and fit to act as a humane officer, the court shall issue an order denying confirmation of the appointment.

(d) If the court grants the petition, the county clerk shall immediately enter in a book to be kept in the county clerk’s office and designated “Record of Humane Officers” the name of the officer, the name of the society appointing the officer, the number of the officer’s badge, the date of the filing, and the case number of the court
 order confirming the appointment. At the time of the filing, the county clerk shall collect from the society a fee of five dollars ($5), which shall be full payment for all services to be performed by the county clerk under this section.

(e) All appointments of humane officers shall automatically expire if the society disbands or legally dissolves.

(f) (1) The society appointing an officer may revoke an appointment at any time by filing in the office of the county clerk in which the appointment of the officer is recorded a copy of the revocation in writing under the letterhead of the society and duly certified by its executive officer. Upon the filing, the county clerk shall enter the fact of the revocation and the date of the filing of the revocation opposite the
 name of the officer in the record of humane officers.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), any duly authorized sheriff or local police agency or the California Animal Welfare Association may initiate a revocation hearing by filing a petition to Revoke Appointment of a Humane Officer. The petition shall show cause why an appointment should be revoked and shall be made to the superior court in the jurisdiction of the appointment.
 Filing, service, and format of the petition and any oppositions and reply papers shall conform to the law and motion requirements under the Code of Civil Procedure, California Rules of Court, and this code. A proceeding pursuant to this paragraph shall be a special proceeding within the meaning of Section 23 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(A) Notice of the hearing date and a copy of the petition shall be served in the same manner as a summons upon the humane officer subject to the petition, the society that appointed the officer, the agencies and association described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b); except the party filing the petition shall not be required to serve copies of those documents upon itself.

(B) Upon a finding of good cause, the court shall issue an order granting
 the petition to revoke the appointment. The county clerk shall immediately enter the revocation and the date of the court order opposite the name of the officer in the record of humane officers. The clerk of the superior court shall give notice of the order to the parties described in subparagraph (A) and to the county clerk-recorder.

(g) The society appointing the humane officer shall pay the training expenses of the humane officer attending the training required pursuant to this section.

(h) (1) (A) A level 1 humane officer is not a peace officer, but may exercise the powers of a peace officer at all places within the state in order to prevent the perpetration of any act of cruelty upon any animal and to that end may summon to the officer’s
 aid any bystander. A level 1 humane officer may use reasonable force necessary to prevent the perpetration of any act of cruelty upon any animal.

(B) A level 1 humane officer may make arrests for the violation of any penal law of this state relating to or affecting animals in the same manner as any peace officer and may serve search warrants.

(C) A level 1 humane officer is authorized to carry firearms while exercising the duties of a humane officer, upon satisfactory completion of the training specified in subparagraph (D), if the requirements in subparagraph (F) are met.

(D) A level 1 humane officer shall, before appointment, provide evidence satisfactory to the appointing society that the officer has successfully
 completed the following requirements:

(i) At least 20 hours of a course of training in animal care sponsored or provided by an accredited postsecondary institution or any other provider approved by the California Veterinary Medical Association the focus of which shall be the identification of disease, injury, and neglect in domestic animals and livestock.

(ii) At least 40 hours of a course of training in the state humane laws relating to the powers and duties of a humane officer, sponsored or provided by an accredited postsecondary institution, law enforcement agency, or the California Animal Welfare Association.

(iii) The basic training for a level 1 reserve officer by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training
 pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 832.6 of the Penal Code.

(E) A person shall not be appointed as a level 1 humane officer until the person meets the criteria in Sections 1029, 1030, and 1031 of the Government Code. A humane society or society for the
 prevention of cruelty to animals shall complete a background investigation, using standards defined by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training as guidelines for all level 1 humane officer appointments.

(F) (i) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a level 1 humane officer may carry a firearm only if authorized by, and only under the terms and conditions specified by, the officer’s appointing society.

(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a level 1 humane officer shall not be authorized to carry a firearm unless and until the officer’s appointing society has adopted a policy on the use of deadly force by its officers and the officer has been instructed in that policy.

(2) (A) A level 2 humane officer is not a peace officer, but may exercise the powers of a peace officer at all places within the state in order to prevent the perpetration of any act of cruelty upon any animal and to that end may summon to the officer’s aid any bystander. A level 2 humane officer may use reasonable force necessary to prevent the perpetration of any act of cruelty upon any animal.

(B) A level 2 humane officer may make arrests for the violation of any penal law of this state relating to or affecting animals in the same manner as any peace officer and may serve search warrants during the course and within the scope of appointment, upon the successful completion of a course relating to the exercise of the police powers specified in Section 832
 of the Penal Code, except the power to carry and use firearms.

(C) A level 2 humane officer is not authorized to carry firearms.

(D) A level 2 humane officer shall, before appointment, provide evidence satisfactory to the appointing society that the officer has successfully completed courses of training in the following subjects:

(i) At least 20 hours of a course of training in animal care sponsored or provided by an accredited postsecondary institution or any other provider approved by the California Veterinary Medical Association, the focus of which is the identification of disease, injury, and neglect in domestic animals and livestock.

(ii) At least 40 hours
 of a course of training in the state humane laws relating to the powers and duties of a humane officer, sponsored or provided by an accredited postsecondary institution, law enforcement agency, or the California Animal Welfare Association.

(E) A person shall not be appointed as a level 2 humane officer until the person meets the criteria in Sections 1029, 1030, and 1031 of the Government Code. A humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shall complete a background investigation, using standards defined by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training as guidelines, for all level 2 humane officer appointments.

(3) During each three-year period following the date on which the certified copy of the court order confirming the appointment of
 a humane officer was filed with the county clerk, the humane officer shall complete 40 hours of continuing education and training relating to the powers and duties of a humane officer, which education and training shall be sponsored or provided by an accredited postsecondary institution, law enforcement agency, or the California Animal Welfare Association. A certificate of compliance shall be served no later than 21 days after the expiration of each three-year period on the Department of Justice with copies served on the superior court, agencies, and associations described in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). The Department of Justice may charge a reasonable fee sufficient to cover the costs of maintaining records of certificates of compliance. The certificate of compliance shall also include documentation that the humane society or society for the prevention
 of cruelty to animals is in compliance with subparagraph (F) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b). Service on the Department of Justice shall be in compliance with procedures set forth by the Department of Justice. The Department of Justice shall post the filing procedures, as they may be updated from time to time, on its internet website. Failure to file the certificate of compliance with the Department of Justice no later than 21 days after the expiration of a three-year period shall result in immediate revocation of the appointment.

(4) If the humane officer is authorized to carry a firearm, the officer shall complete ongoing weapons training and range qualifications at least every six months pursuant to subdivision (t) of Section 830.3 of the Penal Code. A certificate of compliance pursuant to this section shall be served no later than 21
 days after the expiration of a six-month period on the Department of Justice with copies served on the superior court, and on the agencies and associations described in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). The Department of Justice may charge a reasonable fee sufficient to cover the costs of maintaining records of certificates of compliance. The certificate of compliance shall also include documentation that the humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals is in compliance with subparagraph (F) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b). Service on the Department of Justice shall be in compliance with procedures set forth by the Department of Justice. The Department of Justice shall post the filing procedures, as they may be updated from time to time, on its internet website. Failure to file the certificate of compliance with the Department of
 Justice no later than 21 days after the expiration of a six-month period shall result in immediate revocation of the appointment.

(5) (A) A humane officer may carry a wooden club or baton if the officer has satisfactorily completed the course of instruction certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training in the carrying and use of the club or baton pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 22295 of the Penal Code.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a humane officer may carry a wooden club or baton only if authorized by, and only under the terms and conditions specified by, the officer’s appointing society.

(i) Every humane officer shall, when making an arrest, exhibit and
 expose a suitable badge to be adopted by the society under this part of which the officer is an appointee which shall bear its name and a number. Uniforms worn by humane officers shall prominently display the name of the appointing society. Humane officer uniforms shall not display the words “state” or “California,” except to the extent that one or both of those words are part of the appointing society’s incorporated name.

(j) Any person resisting a humane officer in the performance of the officer’s duty as provided in this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. Any person who has not been appointed and qualified as a humane officer as provided in this section, or whose appointment has been revoked as provided in this section, or whose appointment, having expired, has not been renewed as provided in this section, who shall represent themself to be
 or shall attempt to act as an officer shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(k) No humane officer shall serve a search warrant without providing prior notice to local law enforcement agencies operating within that jurisdiction.

(l) Any humane society, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, or person, who knowingly provides a court with false or forged documentation for the appointment of a humane officer, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(m) Except as otherwise provided by this section, a humane officer shall serve only in the county in which the court that appointed the officer sits. A humane officer may serve in another county if the humane
 officer gives notice requesting consent to
 the sheriff of the county in which the officer intends to serve, and acquires consent from that sheriff of the county in which the officer intends to serve, or from a person authorized by the sheriff to give that consent. A sheriff shall promptly respond to any request by a humane officer to serve in the sheriff’s jurisdiction and any request shall not be unreasonably denied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 5.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14503.

The governing body of a local agency, by ordinance, may authorize employees of public animal shelters, societies for the prevention of cruelty to animals, and humane societies, who have qualified as humane officers pursuant to Section 14502, and which societies or animal shelters have contracted with such local agency to provide animal care or protection services, to issue notices to appear in court pursuant to Chapter
 5c (commencing with Section 853.5) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code for violations of state or local animal control laws. Those employees shall not be authorized to take any person into custody even if the person to whom the notice is delivered does not give a written promise to appear in court. The authority of these employees is to be limited to the jurisdiction of the local agency authorizing the employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 7, Sec. 4.   (AB 1553)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14504.

All humane societies and societies for the prevention of cruelty to animals, and all humane officers, shall be in full compliance with Section 14502 on or before January 1, 2012. Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, a level 1 or level 2 humane officer confirmed prior to January 1, 2012, shall not be required to seek a new court order confirming his or her appointment. However, a level 2 humane officer shall provide proof of compliance with subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 14502 by filing a certificate of compliance with the Department of Justice on or before January 1, 2012, or that humane officer’s appointment shall be immediately revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 47.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14505.

Any law enforcement agency that is requested to provide summary criminal history information pursuant to Section 13300 of the Penal Code may charge the humane society or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals a fee not to exceed the reasonable costs of preparing reports and costs to maintain certificates of compliance as required by Section 14502.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 652, Sec. 12.   (SB 1417)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 12. NONPROFIT COOPERATIVE AGRICULTURAL MARKETING ASSOCIATIONS [14550. - 14551.]

14550.

In order to promote, foster, and encourage the intelligent and orderly marketing of agricultural products through cooperation; to eliminate speculation and waste; to make the distribution of agricultural products between producer and consumer as direct as can be efficiently done; and to stabilize the marketing of agricultural products, this act is passed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 598, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14551.

It is here recognized that agriculture is characterized by individual production in contrast to the group or factory system that characterizes other forms of industrial production; and that the ordinary form of corporate organization permits industrial groups to combine for the purpose of group production and the ensuing group marketing; and that the public has an interest in permitting farmers to bring their industry to the high degree of efficiency and merchandising skill evidenced in the manufacturing industries; and that the public interest urgently needs to prevent the migration from the farm to the city in order to keep up farm production and to preserve the agricultural supply of the nation; and that the public interest demands that the farmer be encouraged to attain a superior and more direct system of marketing in the substitution of merchandising for the blind, unscientific, and speculative selling of crops.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 598, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 13. BENEFIT CORPORATIONS [14600. - 14631.]



  CHAPTER 1. Preliminary Provisions [14600. - 14604.]

14600.

(a) This part shall be applicable to all benefit corporations.

(b) The existence of a provision of this part shall not of itself create any implication that a contrary or different rule of law is or would be applicable to a business corporation that is not a benefit corporation. This part shall not affect any statute or rule of law that is or would be applicable to a corporation that is not a benefit
 corporation.

(c) The provisions of the General Corporation Law (Division 1 (commencing with Section 100)) shall apply to benefit corporations, except where those provisions are in conflict with or inconsistent with the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.   (AB 361)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14601.

As used in this part:

(a) “Benefit corporation” means a corporation organized under the General Corporation Law that has elected to become subject to this part and whose status as a benefit corporation has not been terminated as provided in this part.

(b) “Benefit enforcement proceeding” means a claim or action relating to any of the following:

(1) Failure to pursue the general public benefit purpose of the benefit corporation or any specific public benefit purpose set forth in its articles.

(2) Violation of a duty or standard of conduct imposed on a director pursuant to this part.

(3) Failure of the benefit corporation to deliver or post an annual benefit report as required by Section 14630.

(c) “General public benefit” means a material positive impact on society and the environment, taken as a whole, as assessed against a third-party standard, from the business and operations of a benefit corporation.

(d) “Minimum status vote” means that:

(1) In the case of a
 corporation, in addition to any other approval or vote required by Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) or the articles of incorporation, both of the following shall apply:

(A) The shareholders of every class or series shall be entitled to vote on the corporate action regardless of any limitation stated in the articles or bylaws on the voting rights of any class or series.

(B) The corporate action shall be approved by the outstanding shares of each class or series by at least two-thirds of the votes, or greater vote if required in the articles of incorporation, that all shareholders of the class or series are entitled to cast on that action.

(2) In the case of a domestic other business entity (Section 167.7), both of the following shall apply in addition to any other approval, vote, or consent required by the
 statutory law, if any, that principally governs the internal affairs of the entity or any provision of the publicly filed record or document required to form the entity, if any, or of any agreement binding some or all of the holders of equity interests in the entity:

(A) The holders of every class or series of interest in the entity that are entitled to receive a distribution of any kind from the entity regardless of any otherwise applicable limitation on the voting rights of the interest.

(B) The action shall be approved by the vote or consent of the holders described in subparagraph (A) by at least two-thirds of the votes or consents, or greater vote or consent if required in the articles of incorporation, of those holders.

(e) “Specific public benefit” includes all of the following:

(1) Providing low-income or underserved individuals or communities with beneficial products or services.

(2) Promoting economic opportunity for individuals or communities beyond the creation of jobs in the ordinary course of business.

(3) Preserving the environment.

(4) Improving human health.

(5) Promoting the arts, sciences, or advancement of knowledge.

(6) Increasing the flow of capital to entities with a public benefit purpose.

(7) The accomplishment of any other particular benefit for society or the environment.

(f) “Subsidiary” of a person means an entity in which the person owns beneficially or of record 50 percent or more of the outstanding equity interests. For purposes of this definition, a percentage of ownership in an entity shall be calculated as if all outstanding rights to acquire equity interests in the entity had been exercised.

(g) “Third-party standard” means a standard for defining, reporting, and assessing overall corporate social and environmental performance to which all of the following apply:

(1) The standard is a comprehensive assessment of the impact of the business and the business’s operations upon the considerations listed in paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 14620.

(2) The standard is developed by an entity that